Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 11 Seaweed

46-11-1.
Taking of seaweed by inhabitants of Barrington.

The inhabitants of the town of Barrington may, at all times between the rising and setting of the sun, take up and carry off from the public beach in Barrington, extending west from Hyde’s Hole to land now or formerly of the heirs of John Watson, with their vehicles, not exceeding two (2) loads of seaweed each in any one day; provided, that no person shall take more than one load of seaweed in any one day, until all who have repaired to the beach with their teams shall have obtained one load each.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 120, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 146, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 151, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 353, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-11-1

.

46-11-2.
Privilege restricted to Barrington inhabitants.

No person other than an inhabitant of the town of Barrington shall be permitted to take or carry off from the beach any seaweed in any manner whatsoever.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 120, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 146, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 151, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 353, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

46-11-2

.

46-11-3.
Penalty for violations.

Every person who shall take or carry off from the beach any seaweed, contrary to the provisions of this chapter, shall forfeit ten dollars ($10.00) for each and every load of seaweed so carried off, one-half (1/2) thereof to the use of the person suing for the same and one-half (1/2) thereof to the use of the town of Barrington.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 120, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 146, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 151, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 353, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

46-11-3

.